Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1225
Administrator; micropublishing and computer output microfilm
services; charges.

The administrator shall
provide for a system of charges for micropublishing services and computer
output microfilm services rendered by the central microfilming agency to any
other state agency when these charges are allocable
to a particular project carried on by such microfilming agency. Such charges
shall, as nearly as may be practical, reflect the actual cost of services
provided by the central microfilming agency. The administrator shall extend
this system of charges to include source document microfilming. The administrator shall extend
this system of charges and user fees for all micrographic equipment which
is the property of the administrator and which is used by any other state
agency.

Laws 1977, LB 520, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 29.